languages/apertium-nog/apertium-nog.nog.twol
Alphabet

 А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н О П Р С Т У Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я
 а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я

 %{A%}:а
 %{E%}:а
 %{u%}:у
 %{I%}:ы
 %{L%}:л
 %{D%}:д
! %{D²%}:д %{D²%}:т
! %{D³%}:д %{D³%}:т %{D³%}:н
 %{G%}:г
 %{M%}:м
 %{l%}:л  %{l%}:н
 %{s%}:с 
 %{y%}:ы
 %{n%}:н
 %{й%}:0
 %{ь%}:0
 %{e%}:0
 %{Я%}:я
 %{❗%}:0
 %{☭%}:0
 % 
 
 %>:0  ;

Sets 

Vow = а э и о у А Э И О У     ! Аь Уь Оь 
      я е ы ё ю Я Е Ы Ё Ю  ;  ! Аь уь Оь

Cns = Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ь Ъ        ! Нъ
      б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ь ъ        ! нъ
      %{L%} %{G%} %{M%} %{D%} %{s%} %{n%} %{l%} ;  ! 

VoicelessCns = п б ф т д с ч ш к г х ;

VoicedObstruents = з ж ;

FrontVow = э е и ь ;

Nasals = м н ;        ! rules will need (:ъ) or similar for нъ

Abstract = %{s%} %{n%} %{e%} ;
AbstractCns = %{s%} %{n%} ;


Rules 

!"Vowel harmony for {ь}"
!%{ь%}:ь <=> [ [ :э | :и | :е ] :Cns* :Cns ]/[ :0 - [ Abstract:0 ] | %>: ] [ :у | :а | :о ]  _ ;

"Vowel harmony for {ь} (surface in front-vowel endings)"
%{ь%}:ь <=> [ [ :FrontVow | :ь ] :Cns :Cns* ]/[ :0 - %{e%}:0 ] %{u%}:у _ ;
            [ и:у ] %>: %{u%}:0 _ ;  ! for stems ending in и
        !except
            ! [ :Vow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] %{u%}:0 _ ;  ! don't insert if у is deleting
            ! %{u%}:0 _ ;  ! don't insert if у is deleting

!"и and ы delete when stem-final"  ! really, assimilation, but this works for orthography
!Vx:0 <=>  _ %>: %{u%}: ;
!     where Vx in ( и ы ) ;

"и and ы assimilate before в when stem-final"
Vx:у <=>  _ %>: %{u%}: ;
     where Vx in ( и ы ) ;



!"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A}"
!%{A%}:Vy  <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* :Cns ]/[ :0 - [ Abstract:0 ] | %>: ] _ ;
!        where LastVowel in (  э и я е ы ё ю )
!                     Vy in (  е е а е а а а ) matched ; 
!
!"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {I} ь"
!%{I%}:Vy  <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* :Cns ]/[ :0 - [ Abstract:0 ] | %>: ] _ ;
!        where LastVowel in (  э и я е ы ё ю )
!                     Vy in (  и и ы и ы ы ы ) matched ; 
!
"Deletion of {s} after a consonant"
%{s%}:0 <=> [ :Cns | й: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;

"Deletion of {n} word final"
%{n%}:0 <=>  _ (:0) .#. ;


"Deletion of {I} after vowels"
%{I%}:0 <=> [ :Vow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;

"Deletion of {A} after vowels"
%{A%}:0 <=> [ :Vow ]/[ [ :0 - й:0 ] | %>: ] _ ;

"Deletion of {u} after vowel-final stems"
%{u%}:0 <=> [ :Vow | [ :Vow :ь ] ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;
                              [ и:у | ы:у ] %>: _ ;

!! TODO: Some verbs end in -уь (e.g. буьгуьв)
"Deletion of ь when vowel-initial stem follows"
! е behaves like a consonant after vowels; i.e., it's /йэ/
ь:0 <=> _ %>: [ :Vow - :е ]/[ :0 ] ;
!       except
!             [ :а | :о | :у ] _ %>: [ :Vow ]/[ :0 ] ;
    except
        _ й: %>: %{E%}: ;

"Passive {l} becomes n after verb stem ending in /l/"
%{l%}:н <=> [ л :Vow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;


"Vowel harmony for {A}"
%{A%}:е <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns :Cns* ]/[ :0 - %{e%}:0 ] _ ;
                                          :Cns ь: :0* _ ;
                   [ %{e%}:0 :Cns* ]/[ :0 - %{e%}:0 ] _ ;
                     [ :Vow :ь й:0 ]/[ :0 - %{e%}:0 ] _ ;
        except
       [ [ :Vow - :FrontVow ] :Cns* й: ]/[ :0 - й:0 ] _ ; ! avoid conflict with {A}:я
                      [ :Vow ]/[ [ :0 - й:0 ] | %>: ] _ ; ! avoid conflict with {A}:0

"Vowel harmony for {E}"
%{E%}:е <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns :Cns* ]/[ :0 - %{e%}:0 ] _ ;
                   [ %{e%}:0 :Cns* ]/[ :0 - %{e%}:0 ] _ ;
              [ :Vow :ь :Cns :Cns* ]/[ :0 - %{e%}:0 ] _ ;
                     [ :Vow :ь й:0 ]/[ :0 - %{e%}:0 ] _ ;
        except
            [ :Vow (:ь) ]/[ :0 - й:0 ]* _ ;
       [ [ :Vow - :FrontVow ] [ :Cns - :ь ]* й: ]/[ :0 - й:0 ] _ ; ! avoid conflict with {E}:я

"{E} to й after vowel"
%{E%}:й <=> [ :Vow (:ь) ]/[ :0 - й:0 ]* _ ;
        except
            й:0/[ :0 - й:0 ]* _ ;


"Vowel harmony for {Я}"
%{Я%}:е <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* ]/[ :0 - %{e%}:0 ] _ ;
! the following can be uncommented if needed
!                                          :Cns ь: :0* _ ;
!                   [ %{e%}:0 :Cns* ]/[ :0 - %{e%}:0 ] _ ;

!! TODO: Check this rule -{A}{й}{A}{G}
!"Yotised vowel in suffix "
!%{A%}:Vx <=> :Vy %{й%}: _ ;
!        where Vy in ( а  е )
!              Vx in ( я  е )
!        matched;
"{A} becomes я in back vowel contexts after stems in й"
%{A%}:я <=> [ [ :Vow - :FrontVow ] :Cns* й: ]/[ :0 - й:0 ]* _ ;
        except
                                         [ :Vow :ь й:* ]/:0 _ ;
                            [ :Vow ]/[ [ :0 - й:0 ] | %>: ] _ ; ! don't {A}:я when {A} should :0

"{E} becomes я in back vowel contexts after stems in й"
%{E%}:я <=> [ [ :Vow - :FrontVow ] [ :Cns - :ь ]* й: ]/[ :0 - й:0 ]* _ ;
        except
            [ :Vow :ь й:* ]/:0 _ ;

"й deletes before {A} and {E}"
й:0 <=> _ :0* [ %{A%}: | %{E%}: ] ;


"Vowel harmony for {I}"
%{I%}:и <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns :Cns* ]/[ :0 - %{e%}:0 ] _ ;
                            :Cns ь: :0* _ ;
            [ %{e%}:0 :Cns* ]/[ :0 - %{e%}:0 ] _ ;
        except
            [ :Vow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;    ! avoid conflict with deletion after vowels
            %{n%}:н/[ :0 | %>: ] _ .#. ; ! avoid conflict with accusative deletion


! DOESN'T EVER HAPPEN??
!"{L} becomes н"
!%{L%}:н <=> :Nasal (:ъ) :0* _ ;
            
! in progress
"{M} desonorisation rule"
%{M%}:б <=> :VoicedObstruents :0* _ ;
!           this is the old rule, but it seems the generalisation about nasals is wrong
!           [ [ :Nasals (:ъ) ] | :VoicedObstruents ] :0* _ ;
        except
            :Nasals/:0 _ :Vow :Nasals ;
!
!from Kazakh:
!"M Desonorisation"
!%{M%}:б <=> [ :Nasals | :VoicedObstruents ]/[ %>: | %  ] _ ;
!                                 [ %{н%}: | %{з%}: ] %>: _ ;
!            except
!                                    :Nasals %>: _ Vow :Nasals ;

"Forward voicing assimilation"
Cx:Cy <=> :VoicelessCns/:0 _ ;
          [ :в %{☭%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{☭%}:0 ] _ ;
      except
          %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: .#. ;
          %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: :н :ъ .#. ;
      where Cx in ( %{M%} %{D%} %{G%} )
            Cy in (   п     т     к   )
          matched;

"{D} Nasal harmony"
%{D%}:н <=> :Nasals/:0 _ :Vow :Nasals ;
        except
            %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: .#. ;
            %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: :н :ъ .#. ;


"Deletion of accusative and genitive {D} after {n}"
%{D%}:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: .#. ;
            %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: :н :ъ .#. ;

!"Deletion of {n} before genitive {D}{I}"
!%{n%}:0 <=>  _ %>: %{D%}: %{I%}: :н :ъ ;

"Deletion of {I} after {n} for px3.acc"
%{I%}:0 <=> %{n%}:н/[ :0 | %>: ] _ .#. ;

"Deletion of dative {G} after px1sg, px2sg"
%{G%}:0 <=>  %{I%}: :Nasals %>: _ %{A%}: .#. ;

"Intervocalic voicing of п/к"
Cx:Cy <=> :Vow (:0) _ ([ :0 - %{❗%}:0 ]) %>: (:0) :Vow ;
          except
            %{❗%}:0 _ ;
                    _ :0* %{I%}: :п ;
          where Cx in ( п к )
                Cy in ( б г )
                matched;

"Lenition of п to в"
п:в <=> _ :0* %{I%}: :п ;

"Voicing of к in context where п doesn't simply voice"
к:г <=> _ :0* %{I%}: :п ;
